Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 11
INDEPENDENT MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS

1-13.5-1101. Independent mail ballot elections.

Any local government may conduct an independent mail ballot election utilizing the procedures in this part 11.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 43, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1102. Definitions.

As used in this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Independent mail ballot election" means a mail ballot election that the governing body of a local government determines will not be coordinated by the county clerk and recorder.

"Mail ballot packet" means the packet of information provided by the designated election official to eligible electors in the independent mail ballot election. The packet includes the ballot, instructions for completing the ballot, a secrecy envelope, and a return envelope.

"Publication" means one-time printing in a newspaper of general circulation in the local government or proposed special district if there is such a newspaper, or, if not, in a newspaper in the county in which the local government or proposed special district is or will be located. For a local government with territory in more than one county, if there is no newspaper of general circulation in the local government, "publication" means the one-time printing in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the local government is located and in which fifty or more eligible electors of the local government resides.

"Return envelope" means an envelope that is printed with spaces for the name and address of, and a self-affirmation substantially in the form described in section 1-13.5-605 (1) to be signed by, an eligible elector voting in an independent mail ballot election, into which envelope must fit a secrecy envelope. A return envelope must be designed to allow election officials, upon examining the signature, name, and address on the outside of the envelope, to determine whether the enclosed ballot is being submitted by an eligible elector who has not previously voted in that particular election.

"Secrecy envelope" means the envelope or sleeve used for an independent mail ballot election that contains the eligible elector's ballot for the election and that is designed to conceal and maintain the confidentiality of the elector's vote until the counting of votes for that particular election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 43, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1269, § 11, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1103. Independent mail ballot elections - optional - cooperation with county clerk and recorder permitted - exception.

If the governing body of any local government determines that an election shall be by independent mail ballot, the designated election official for the local government shall conduct the election by mail ballot pursuant to this part 11.

Nothing in this part 11 requires that any election be conducted by mail ballot.

Notwithstanding the fact that an independent mail ballot election is an election that is not coordinated by a county clerk and recorder, the designated election official of a local government and the county clerk and recorder may, by agreement, cooperate on any election procedure or notice.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the designated election official of a local government shall mail a ballot to every eligible elector of the local government who resides within the boundaries of the local government and who is a covered voter, as that term is defined in section 1-8.3-102, for any election conducted under this article.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 44, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(4) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1269, § 12, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1104. Preelection process - notification of independent mail ballot election - plan required - duties of designated election official.

The designated election official responsible for conducting an election that is to be by independent mail ballot pursuant to this part 11 shall, no later than fifty-five days prior to the election, have on file at the principal office of the local government or designated election official a plan for conducting the independent mail ballot election. The plan is a public record.

The designated election official shall supervise the distributing, handling, and counting of ballots and the survey of returns, and shall take the necessary steps to protect the confidentiality of the ballots cast and the integrity of the election.

No elector information may be delivered to an elector in the form of a sample ballot.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 44, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1105. Procedures for conducting independent mail ballot election.

Official ballots must be prepared and all other preelection procedures followed as otherwise provided by law; except that mail ballot packets must be prepared in accordance with this part 11.

Except for coordinated elections conducted pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement as a mail ballot election where the county clerk and recorder is the coordinated election official under the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title, no later than thirty days prior to election day, the county clerk and recorder in which the local government is located shall submit to the designated election official conducting the independent mail ballot election a complete preliminary list of registered electors. For special district independent mail ballot elections, the county clerk and recorder and county assessor of each county in which a special district is located shall certify and submit to the designated election official a property owners list and a list of registered electors residing within the affected district.

Not later than twenty days prior to election day, the county clerk and recorder and, if appropriate, county assessor, required to submit a preliminary list in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall submit to the designated election official a supplemental list of the names of eligible electors or property owners who registered to vote on or before twenty-two days prior to the election and whose names were not included on the preliminary list.

All registered electors' names and property owners lists provided to a designated election official under this section shall include the last mailing address of each elector.

No later than twenty days before an election, the designated election official, or the coordinated election official if so provided by an intergovernmental agreement, shall provide notice by publication of an independent mail ballot election conducted pursuant to this article, which notice shall state, as applicable for the particular election for which the notice is provided, the information set forth in section 1-13.5-502.

The notice required to be given by this paragraph (d) is in lieu of the notice requirements set forth in section 1-13.5-502.

Subsequent to the preparation of ballots, but prior to the mailing required under subsection (4) of this section, a designated election official shall provide a mail ballot to an eligible elector requesting the ballot at the office designated in the mail ballot plan.

Not sooner than twenty-two days before an election, and no later than fifteen days before an election, the designated election official shall mail to each active registered elector and any electors who are authorized to vote pursuant to section 1-13.5-202 or other applicable law, at the last mailing address appearing in the registration records and in accordance with United States postal service regulations, a mail ballot packet marked "Do not forward. Address correction requested.", or any other similar statement that is in accordance with United States postal service regulations.

The ballot or ballot label must contain the following warning:

The return envelope must have printed on it a self-affirmation substantially in the form provided in section 1-13.5-605 (1).

The signing of the self-affirmation on the return envelope constitutes an affirmation by the eligible elector to whom the ballot was provided, under penalty of perjury, that the facts stated in the self-affirmation are true. If the eligible elector is unable to sign, the eligible elector may affirm by making a mark on the self-affirmation, with or without assistance, that is witnessed by another person who signs as witness where indicated on the return envelope.

Repealed.

Not sooner than twenty-two days prior to election day, and until 7 p.m. on election day, mail ballots must be made available at the office designated in the mail ballot plan for eligible electors who are not listed or who are listed as "Inactive" on the county voter registration records or, for special district independent mail ballot elections, not listed on the property owners list or the registration list but who are authorized to vote pursuant to section 1-13.5-202 or other applicable law.

An eligible elector may obtain a replacement ballot if his or her original ballot was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or for any other reason not received by the eligible elector. An eligible elector may obtain a ballot if a mail ballot packet was not sent to the elector because the eligibility of the elector could not be determined at the time the mail ballot packets were mailed. In order to obtain a ballot, the eligible elector must sign a sworn statement specifying the reason for requesting the ballot, which statement must be presented to the designated election official no later than 7 p.m. on election day. The designated election official shall keep a record of each ballot issued in accordance with this paragraph (e) with a list of each ballot obtained pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (4).

A designated election official or election judge shall not transmit a mail ballot packet under this paragraph (e) unless a sworn statement requesting the ballot is received on or before election day. A ballot may be transmitted directly to the eligible elector requesting the ballot at the office designated in the mail ballot plan or may be mailed to the eligible elector at the address provided in the sworn statement. Such ballots may be cast no later than 7 p.m. on election day.

Upon receipt of a ballot, the eligible elector shall mark the ballot, sign and complete the self-affirmation on the return envelope, and comply with the instructions provided with the ballot.

The eligible elector may return the marked ballot to the designated election official by United States mail or by depositing the ballot at the office of the official or any place identified in the mail ballot plan by the designated election official. The ballot must be returned in the return envelope. If an eligible elector returns the ballot by mail, the elector must provide postage. The ballot must be received at the office identified in the mail ballot plan or an identified depository, which must remain open until 7 p.m. on election day. The depository must be identified by the designated election official and located in a secure place under the supervision of the designated election official, an election judge, or another person named by the designated election official.

Once the ballot is returned, an election judge shall first qualify the submitted ballot by comparing the information on the return envelope with the registration records and property owners list, as applicable, to determine whether the ballot was submitted by an eligible elector who has not previously voted in the election. If the ballot qualifies and is otherwise valid, the election judge shall indicate in the pollbook that the eligible elector cast a ballot and deposit the ballot in an official ballot box.

All deposited ballots shall be counted as provided in this part 11. A mail ballot is valid and shall be counted only if it is returned in the return envelope, the self-affirmation on the return envelope is signed and completed by the eligible elector to whom the ballot was issued, and the information on the return envelope is verified in accordance with subsection (6) of this section. Mail ballots shall be counted in the same manner as provided by section 1-13.5-609 for counting paper ballots or section 1-13.5-708 or 1-13.5-811 for counting electronic ballots. If the election judge or designated election official determines that an eligible elector to whom a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the first ballot returned by the elector shall be considered the elector's official ballot. Rejected ballots shall be handled in the same manner as provided in section 1-13.5-1010.

Warning:

Any person who, by use of force or other means, unduly influences an eligible elector to vote in any particular manner or to refrain from voting, or who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits any mail ballot before or after it has been cast, or who destroys, defaces, mutilates, or tampers with a ballot is subject, upon conviction, to imprisonment, or to a fine, or both.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 45, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(3), (4)(d), (4)(e)(II), and (5)(b) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 589, § 73, effective May 18; (4)(c)(III) repealed, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1269, § 13, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 538, § 5, effective September 7.

1-13.5-1105.5. Voting by electors at group residential facilities.

For independent mail ballot elections conducted under this part 11, upon the request of any eligible elector of the local government residing in a facility described in section 1-7.5-113 (1), the designated election official shall appoint a committee for delivery of mail ballots to, and return of voted mail ballots from, the facility in accordance with section 1-7.5-113.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 48, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1106. Delivery of misdelivered ballots.

If an elector delivers a ballot, mail ballot, or absentee voter's ballot to the designated election official, polling place, or election judge of another local government, or to the county clerk and recorder, the recipient may accept the ballot and, if accepted, must arrange for its delivery to the proper person by 7 p.m. on election day. The reasonable cost of such delivery must be paid by the local government conducting the election in which the voter intended to cast the ballot.

If the error in delivery of a ballot is discovered too late for delivery by 7 p.m. on election day, the ballot must be mailed to the proper designated election official and maintained as an election record, but not counted.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 48, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1269, § 14, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1107. Counting mail ballots.

The election officials at the mail ballot counting place shall receive and prepare mail ballots delivered and turned over to them by the election judges for counting. Counting of the mail ballots may begin fifteen days prior to the election and continue until counting is completed. The election official in charge of the mail ballot counting place shall take all precautions necessary to ensure the secrecy of the counting procedures, and no information concerning the count shall be released by the election officials or watchers until after 7 p.m. on election day.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 48, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1108. Write-in candidates.

Any write-in candidate is allowed in independent mail ballot elections if the candidate has filed an affidavit of intent with the designated election official as required by law.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 48, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1109. Challenges.

Votes cast pursuant to this part 11 may be challenged pursuant to and in accordance with law, including the challenge and rejection of ballot provisions set forth in section 1-13.5-1010. Any independent mail ballot election conducted pursuant to this part 11 will not be invalidated on the grounds that an eligible elector did not receive a ballot so long as the designated election official for the political subdivision conducting the election acted in good faith in complying with this part 11.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 48, § 6, effective February 18.